Wisconsin, session 2025, AB137.
do enact as follows:AB137,11Section 1. 66.1105 (6) (a) 22. of the statutes is created to read:AB137,2,3266.1105 (6) (a) 22. For Tax Incremental District Number 9 in the village of 3DeForest, 30 years after the district is created.AB137,24Section 2. 66.1105 (6) (g) 7. of the statutes is created to read:AB137,3,2166.1105 (6) (g) 7. This paragraph does not apply to Tax Increment District 2Number 9 in the village of DeForest.AB137,33Section 3. 66.1105 (7) (am) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB137,3,5466.1105 (7) (am) 10. Notwithstanding subd. 2., for Tax Incremental District 5Number 9 in the village of DeForest, 30 years after the district is created.AB137,46Section 4. 66.1105 (17) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB137,3,10766.1105 (17) (h) Village of DeForest exception. The 12 percent limit described 8under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. does not apply to an amendment to a project plan for Tax 9Incremental District Number 9 in the village of DeForest. The exception in this 10paragraph may not be used for more than one amendment of the project plan.AB137,3,1111